Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3731.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 260E.03, subdivision 15, is amended to read: Subd. 15. Neglect. (a) "Neglect" means the commission or omission of any of the acts specified under clauses (1) to (8), other than by accidental means: (1) failure by a person responsible for a child's care to supply a child with necessary food, clothing, shelter, health, medical, or other care required for the child's physical or mental health when reasonably able to do so; (2) failure to protect a child from conditions or actions that seriously endanger the child's physical or mental health when reasonably able to do so, including a growth delay, which may be referred to as a failure to thrive, that has been diagnosed by a physician and is due to parental neglect; (3) failure to provide for necessary supervision or child care arrangements appropriate for a child after considering factors as the child's age, mental ability, physical condition, length of absence, or environment, when the child is unable to care for the child's own basic needs or safety, or the basic needs or safety of another child in their care; (4) failure to ensure that the child is educated as defined in sections 120A.22 and 260C.163, subdivision 11, which does not include a parent's refusal to provide the parent's child with sympathomimetic medications, consistent with section 125A.091, subdivision 5; (5) prenatal exposure to a controlled substance, as defined in section 253B.02, subdivision 2, used by the mother for a nonmedical purpose, as evidenced by withdrawal symptoms in the child at birth, results of a toxicology test performed on the mother at delivery or the child at birth, medical effects or developmental delays during the child's first year of life that medically indicate prenatal exposure to a controlled substance, or the presence of a fetal alcohol spectrum disorder; (6) medical neglect, as defined in section 260C.007, subdivision 6, clause (5); (7) chronic and severe use of alcohol or a controlled substance by a person responsible for the child's care that adversely affects the child's basic needs and safetynew text begin , except that alcohol or controlled substance use shall not be prima facie evidence of neglect when the person is voluntarily and regularly participating in a recognized rehabilitative program. The sole fact that an individual acts in accordance with section 604A.05 without a separate finding that the child's physical, mental, or emotional condition was or is in imminent danger of becoming impaired as established by a preponderance of the evidence shall not be sufficient to establish prima facie evidence of neglectnew text end ; or (8) emotional harm from a pattern of behavior that contributes to impaired emotional functioning of the child which may be demonstrated by a substantial and observable effect in the child's behavior, emotional response, or cognition that is not within the normal range for the child's age and stage of development, with due regard to the child's culture. (b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to mean that a child is neglected solely because the child's parent, guardian, or other person responsible for the child's care in good faith selects and depends upon spiritual means or prayer for treatment or care of disease or remedial care of the child in lieu of medical care. (c) This chapter does not impose upon persons not otherwise legally responsible for providing a child with necessary food, clothing, shelter, education, or medical care a duty to provide that care. (d) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to mean that a child who has a mental, physical, or emotional condition is neglected solely because the child remains in an emergency department or hospital setting because services, including residential treatment, that are deemed necessary by the child's medical or mental health care professional or county case manager are not available to the child's parent, guardian, or other person responsible for the child's care, and the child cannot be safely discharged to the child's family. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 604A.05, is amended to read: 604A.05 GOOD SAMARITAN OVERDOSE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE. Subdivision 1. Person providing assistance; immunity from new text begin arrest, charge, and new text end prosecution. A person acting in good faith who seeks medical assistance for deleted text begin or acts in concert with a person seeking medical assistance fordeleted text end another person who is experiencing a drug-related overdose may not benew text begin arrested,new text end chargednew text begin ,new text end or prosecuted deleted text begin for the possession, sharing, or use of a controlled substance under section 152.023, subdivision 2, 152.024, or 152.025deleted text end new text begin except for an excluded crimenew text end .new text begin Except for an excluded crime,new text end a person qualifies for the immunities provided in this subdivision only if: (1) the evidence for thenew text begin arrest,new text end chargenew text begin ,new text end or prosecution was obtained as a result of the person's seeking medical assistance for deleted text begin or acting in concert with a person seeking medical assistance fordeleted text end another person; and (2) the person seeks medical assistance for deleted text begin or acts in concert with a person seeking medical assistance fordeleted text end another person who is in need of medical assistance for an immediate health or safety concerndeleted text begin , provided that the person provides a name and contact information, remains on the scene until assistance arrives or is provided, and cooperates with the authoritiesdeleted text end . Good faith does not include seeking medical assistance during the course of the execution of an arrest warrant or search warrant or a lawful search. new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Bystander" means any person who is present at or in the immediate vicinity of an individual experiencing a suspected drug-related overdose, including but not limited to persons who are at the same address, residence, vehicle, or outdoor location where the overdose is occurring. new text end new text begin (c) "Drug-related overdose" means an acute condition, including mania, hysteria, extreme physical illness, respiratory depression or arrest, unconsciousness, or coma, resulting from the consumption or use of a controlled substance, or another substance with which a controlled substance was combined, and that a layperson would reasonably believe to be a drug overdose that requires immediate medical assistance. new text end new text begin (d) "Excluded crime" means a crime that does not qualify for immunity as described in subdivisions 1, 2, and 2a. The following crimes are excluded crimes: new text end new text begin (1) homicide and bodily harm crimes, as described in sections 609.18 to 609.2114; new text end new text begin (2) crimes against the person, as described in sections 609.221 to 609.2241, 609.2242 to 609.2247, 609.229 to 609.233, and 609.245 to 609.265; new text end new text begin (3) sex and labor trafficking crimes, as described in sections 609.281 to 609.284; new text end new text begin (4) sex crimes, as described in sections 609.322 and 609.342 to 609.353; new text end new text begin (5) crimes against the family, as described in sections 609.365 and 609.377 to 609.38; new text end new text begin (6) arson, as described in sections 609.561 to 609.5632; new text end new text begin (7) unlawful transfer of a firearm to a minor, as described in section 609.66, subdivision 1b; new text end new text begin (8) violation of a restraining order, as described in section 609.748, subdivision 6; new text end new text begin (9) harassment and stalking, as described in section 609.749; new text end new text begin (10) a crime not listed in this paragraph that was committed against a person who was less than 18 years of age at the time the crime was committed; new text end new text begin (11) criminal attempt, as described in section 609.17, to commit a crime listed in clauses (1) to (10); new text end new text begin (12) criminal conspiracy, as described in section 609.175, to commit a crime listed in clauses (1) to (10); or new text end new text begin (13) driving while impaired in the first or second degree, as described in sections 169A.24 and 169A.25. new text end Subd. 2. Person experiencing an overdose; immunity fromnew text begin arrest, charge, andnew text end prosecution. A person who experiences a drug-related overdose and is in need of medical assistance may not benew text begin arrested,new text end chargednew text begin ,new text end or prosecuted deleted text begin for possession of a controlled substance under section 152.023, subdivision 2, clauses (4) and (6), 152.024, or 152.025, or possession of drug paraphernaliadeleted text end new text begin except for an excluded crimenew text end .new text begin Except for an excluded crime,new text end a person qualifies for the immunities provided in this subdivision only if the evidence for thenew text begin arrest,new text end chargenew text begin ,new text end or prosecution was obtained as a result of the drug-related overdose and the need for medical assistance. new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Bystander; immunity from arrest, charge, and prosecution. new text end new text begin A bystander may not be arrested, charged, or prosecuted except for an excluded crime. Except for an excluded crime, a bystander qualifies for the immunities provided in this subdivision only if the evidence for the arrest, charge, or prosecution was obtained as a result of the drug-related overdose and the need for medical assistance. new text end Subd. 3. Persons on probation or release. A person's pretrial release, probation, furlough, supervised release, or parole shall not be revoked based on an incident for which the person would be immune from prosecution under subdivision 1 deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end 2new text begin , or 2anew text end . Subd. 4. Effect on other criminal prosecutions. (a) The act ofnew text begin seeking medical assistance ornew text end providing deleted text begin first aid or otherdeleted text end medical assistance to someone who is experiencing a drug-related overdose may be used as a mitigating factor in a criminal prosecution for which immunity is not provided. (b) Nothing in this section shall: deleted text begin (1) be construed to bar the admissibility of any evidence obtained in connection with the investigation and prosecution of other crimes or violations committed by a person who otherwise qualifies for limited immunity under this section; deleted text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end preclude prosecution of a person on the basis of evidence obtained from an independent source; deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end be construed to limit, modify, or remove any immunity from liability currently available to public entities, public employees by law, or prosecutors; or deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end prevent probation officers from conducting drug testing of persons on pretrial release, probation, furlough, supervised release, or parole. deleted text begin Subd. 5. deleted text end deleted text begin Drug-related overdose defined. deleted text end deleted text begin As used in this section, "drug-related overdose" means an acute condition, including mania, hysteria, extreme physical illness, or coma, resulting from the consumption or use of a controlled substance, or another substance with which a controlled substance was combined, and that a layperson would reasonably believe to be a drug overdose that requires immediate medical assistance. deleted text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Occupational licensing, employment, education, housing, and child welfare protections for persons with immunity. new text end new text begin A person who has immunity under this section must not: new text end new text begin (1) be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner or denied any right or privilege, including but not limited to civil liability or disciplinary action by a business or occupational or professional licensing board or office, for conduct granted immunity under this section; new text end new text begin (2) be refused by a landlord, as defined under section 504B.001, subdivision 7, the opportunity to enter into a lease or otherwise be penalized or retaliated against by a landlord solely for conduct granted immunity under this section; new text end new text begin (3) be refused enrollment or otherwise be penalized by a public or private school, primary school, secondary school, college, university, or other bona fide educational institution solely for conduct granted immunity under this section; or new text end new text begin (4) be denied custody of or visitation or parenting time with a minor child under chapters 260C and 260E solely for conduct granted immunity under this section unless the child's physical, mental, or emotional condition has been or is in imminent danger of becoming impaired as a result of the person's behavior as established by a preponderance of the evidence. A denial cannot be based solely on whether, when, and how often a person seeks medical assistance for, or is a bystander to, a drug-related overdose. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes shall renumber section 604A.05, subdivision 1, as section 604A.05, subdivision 1b. The revisor shall also make necessary cross-reference changes consistent with the renumbering. new text end